lt-LT: Pianino dydis: Kabinetinis fortepijonas; Koncertinis fortepijonas; Stacionarus; Vidutinis fortepijonas; Saloninis fortepijonas; Pusiau koncertinis fortepijonas; Spinetas; Studijinis; Pianinas; Kita
nl: Formaat piano: Kleine vleugel; Concertvleugel; Console; Middelgrote vleugel; Salonvleugel; Semi-concertvleugel; Spinet; Studio; Rechtop; Andere
pl: Rozmiar fortepianu: Baby grand; Koncert grand; Konsola; Średni duży; Parlor grand; Semi-concert grand; Szpinet; Studio; Prosto; Inne
hr-HR: Veličina glasovira: Baby grand; Concert grand; Konzola; Medium grand; Parlor grand; Semi-concert grand; Spinet; Studio; Uspravni; Ostalo
el: Μέγεθος πιάνου: Πιάνο με κοντή ουρά; Concert grand; Κονσόλα; Πιάνο με μεσαία ουρά; Πιάνο Parlor με ουρά; Πιάνο ημι-κονσέρτου με ουρά; Σπινέτο; Στούντιο; Όρθιο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Velikost klavirja: Veliki sobni; Veliki koncertni; Konzolni; Srednje veliki; Veliki salonski; Veliki polkoncertni; Spinet; Studijski; Pianino; Drugo
tr: Piyano boyutu: Kısa kuyruklu piyano; Kuyruklu piyano; Konsol; Orta kuyruklu; Küçük kuyruklu piyano; Yarı kuyruklu piyano; Spinet; Stüdyo; Dik; Diğer
zh-CN: 钢琴尺寸: 小型三角钢琴; 音乐会三角钢琴; 游戏机; 中型三角钢琴; 音乐厅三角钢琴; 半音乐会三角钢琴; 斯皮耐琴; 录音棚; 直立; 其他
ko: 피아노 크기: 베이비 그랜드; 콘서트 그랜드; 콘솔; 미디엄 그랜드; 팔러 그랜드; 세미 콘서트 그랜드; 스피넷; 스튜디오; 업라이트; 기타
ja: ピアノのサイズ: ベビーグランド; コンサートグランド; コンソール; ミディアムグランド; パーラーグランド; セミコンサートグランド; スピネット; スタジオ; アップライト; その他
pt-BR: Tamanho do piano: Baby grand; Orquestral; Console; Medium grand; Parlor grand; Semiorquestral grande; Espineta; Estúdio; De pé; Outro
it: Dimensioni del pianoforte: A mezza coda; A gran coda da concerto; Console; A un quarto di coda; A tre quarti di coda; A coda da concerto; Spinetta; Studio; In piedi; Altro
vi: Cỡ đàn piano: Baby Grand; Concert Grand; Console; Medium Grand; Parlor Grand; Semi-Concert Grand; Spinet; Studio; Thẳng đứng; Khác
pt-PT: Tamanho de piano: Piano baby grand; Piano concert grand; Consola; Piano médio grande; Piano de salão grande; Piano semiconcert grand; Espineta; Estúdio; Reto; Outro
fi: Pianon koko: Baby grand; Concert grand; Konsoli; Medium grand; Parlor grand; Semi-concert grand; Spinetti; Studio; Pystyasento; Muu
ru: Размер фортепиано: Детский рояль; Концертный рояль; Консоль; Средний рояль; Салонный рояль; Полуконцертный рояль; Спинет; Студйный; Пианино; Другое
sk-SK: Veľkosť klavíra: Baby grand; Concert grand; Konzola; Medium grand; Parlor grand; Semi-concert grand; Spinet; Štúdiový; Vertikálny; Iné
da: Klaverstørrelse: Baby grand; Koncert grand; Konsol; Medium grand; Parlor grand; Semi-koncert grand; Spinet; Studie; Oprejst; Andet
hu: Zongora mérete: Baby Grand; Concert Grand; Console; Medium Grand; Parlor Grand; Semi-Concert Grand; Spinét; Stúdió; Upright; Egyéb
ro-RO: Dimensiunea pianului: Pian mic cu coadă; Concert grand; Consolă; Medium grand; Parlor grand; Semi-concert grand; Spinet; Studio; Pianină; Altele
zh-TW: 鋼琴尺寸: 小型三角; 音樂會三角; 控制台; 中型三角; 客廳三角; 半音樂會三角; 翼琴; Studio; 直立; 其他
sv: Pianostorlek: Miniflygel; Konsertflygel; Konsol; Mediumflygel; Stora salong; Semi-konsertflygel; Spinett; Studio; Upprätt; Övrigt
cs: Velikost klavíru: Poloviční křídlo; Velké koncertní; Konzola; Středně velké; Salónové; Semikoncertní; Spinety; Studiové; Vertikální; Jiné
es: Tamaño del piano: Gran piano de cola; Gran piano de concierto; Consola; Gran piano de tamaño medio; Gran piano de salón; Gran piano de concierto semicompleto; Espineta; Estudio; Vertical; Otros
de: Klaviergröße: Babyflügel; Konzertflügel; Konsole; Mittlerer Flügel; Salonflügel; Halbkonzertflügel; Spinett; Studio; Aufrecht; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Размер на пиано: Малък роял; Концертен роял; Конзола; Среден роял; Парлър роял; Полуконцертен роял; Спинет; Студио; Изправено пиано; Други
nb: Pianostørrelse: Babyflygel; Konsertflygel; Konsoll; Middels stort flygel; Parlorflygel; Semikonsertflygel; Spinet; Studio; Oppreist; Annet
fr: Taille du piano: Baby Grand; Concert Grand; Console; Medium Grand; Parlor Grand; Semi-Concert Grand; Épinette; Studio; Vertical; Autre
th: ขนาดเปียโน: เบบี้แกรนด์; คอนเสิร์ตแกรนด์; คอนโซล; มีเดียมแกรนด์; พาร์เลอร์แกรนด์; กึ่งคอนเสิร์ตแกรนด์; สพิเน็ต; สตูดิโอ; ตั้งตรง; อื่นๆ
en: Piano size: Baby grand; Concert grand; Console; Medium grand; Parlor grand; Semi-concert grand; Spinet; Studio; Upright; Other